Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-409 Articles of association;
agent, membership list; deception. (a) Any association formed in
accordance with this part shall file the following with the commissioner:

(1) The articles of association;

(2) All amendments and supplements to the articles of
association;

(3) A designation in writing of a resident of this
State as agent for the service of process; and

(4) A list of insurers who are members of the
association and all supplements thereto.

(b) The name of any association or any advertising
or promotional material used in connection with extended health insurance to be
sold, offered or issued pursuant to this section shall not be such as to
mislead or deceive the public. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next